Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-1904
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act, the following definitions apply:

(1) Administrator means a person charged with administration of (a) a program or an office of the department or (b) a private agency;

(2) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;

(3) Director means the Director of Correctional Services;

(4) Inspector General means the Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System appointed under section 50-1905;

(5) Malfeasance means a wrongful act that the actor has no legal right to do or any wrongful conduct that affects, interrupts, or interferes with performance of an official duty;

(6) Management means supervision of subordinate employees;

(7) Misfeasance means the improper performance of some act that a person may lawfully do;

(8) Obstruction means hindering an investigation, preventing an investigation from progressing, stopping or delaying the progress of an investigation, or making the progress of an investigation difficult or slow;

(9) Office means the office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System and includes the Inspector General and other employees of the office;

(10) Private agency means an entity that contracts with the department or contracts to provide services to another entity that contracts with the department; and

(11) Record means any recording in written, audio, electronic, or computer storage form, including, but not limited to, a draft, memorandum, note, report, computer printout, notation, message, medical record, mental health record, case file, clinical record, financial record, and administrative record.

Laws 2015, LB598, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB1094, § 29;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2021), § 47-903;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 56;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 48.